Missouri, session 2026, SB1693.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.060 and 571.070, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 571.060 and 571.070, to read as follows:
571.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
transfer of weapons if he or she:
(1) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away or
delivers a firearm or ammunition for a firearm to any person
who, under the provisions of section 571.070, is not
lawfully entitled to possess such;
(2) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away or
delivers a blackjack to a person less than eighteen years
old without the consent of the child's custodial parent or
guardian, or recklessly, as defined in section 562.016,
sells, leases, loans, gives away or delivers any firearm to
a person less than eighteen years old without the consent of
the child's custodial parent or guardian; provided, that
this does not prohibit the delivery of such weapons to any
peace officer or member of the Armed Forces or National
Guard while performing his or her official duty; [or]
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1693 2
(3) Recklessly, as defined in section 562.016, sells,
leases, loans, gives away or delivers a firearm or
ammunition for a firearm to a person who is intoxicated;
(4) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away, or
delivers a firearm to any person whose name appears on the
Terrorist Screening Center's No Fly List; or
(5) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away, or
delivers a firearm to any person who is a member of a group
of two or more individuals, regardless if organized, that
engages in or has a subgroup that engages in international
or domestic terrorism.
2. Unlawful transfer of weapons under subdivision (1)
of subsection 1 of this section is a class E felony;
unlawful transfer of weapons under subdivisions (2) [and],
(3), (4), and (5) of subsection 1 of this section is a class
A misdemeanor.
3. For purposes of this section, "terrorism" means
activities that:
(1) Involve a violent act or acts dangerous to human
life that violate the criminal laws of the United States or
a state thereof that would be a criminal violation if
committed within the jurisdiction of the United States or a
state thereof; and
(2) Appear to be intended to:
(a) Intimidate or coerce a civilian population;
(b) Influence the policy of a government by
intimidation or coercion; or
(c) Affect the conduct of a government by mass
destruction, assassination, or kidnapping.
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
possession of a firearm if such person knowingly has any
firearm in his or her possession and:

SB 1693 3
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under
the laws of this state, or of a crime under the laws of any
state or of the United States which, if committed within
this state, would be a felony; [or]
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is
habitually in an intoxicated or drugged condition, or is
currently adjudged mentally incompetent;
(3) Such person's name appears on the Terrorist
Screening Center's No Fly List; or
(4) Such person is a member of a group of two or more
individuals, regardless if organized, that engages in or has
a subgroup that engages in international or domestic
terrorism. For purposes of this subdivision, "terrorism"
means activities that:
(a) Involve a violent act or acts dangerous to human
life that are a violation of the criminal laws of the United
States or a state thereof or that would be a criminal
violation if committed within the jurisdiction of the United
States or a state thereof; and
(b) Appear to be intended to:
a. Intimidate or coerce a civilian population;
b. Influence the policy of a government by
intimidation or coercion; or
c. Affect the conduct of a government by mass
destruction, assassination, or kidnapping.
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C
felony, unless a person has been convicted of a dangerous
felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a
prior conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in
which case it is a class B felony.

SB 1693 4
3. The provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1
of this section shall not apply to the possession of an
antique firearm.
✓